South Dakota, session 2026, SB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $10,000,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Agriculture and Natural Resources, for the purpose of providing grants as provided in section
2 of this Act.
Section 2. Of the amount appropriated in section 1 of this Act, $2,000,000 is allocated for
eligible water, wastewater, and storm water projects. To be eligible for funding from this
allocation, projects must be approved by the Board of Water and Natural Resources and be
included in the state water plan.
Of the amount appropriated in section 1 of this Act, $8,000,000 is allocated for statewide
riparian buffer initiative projects.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall
approve vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized
by this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended shall revert in
accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.982.15 2 222
An Act to make an appropriation for eligible water, wastewater, storm water, and riparian
buffer initiative projects and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 222
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 222 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB222 ENROLLED